Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.140

Resolutions—Contents, publication—Hearing, by whom held.

Any local improvement to be paid for in whole or in part by the levy and collection of assessments upon the property within the proposed improvement district may be initiated by a resolution of the city or town council or other legislative authority of the city or town, declaring its intention to order the improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial extent of the improvement, containing a statement that actual assessments may vary from assessment estimates so long as they do not exceed a figure equal to the increased true and fair value the improvement, or street lighting, adds to the property, and notifying all persons who may desire to object thereto to appear and present their objections at a time to be fixed therein.

In the case of trunk sewers and trunk water mains the resolution must describe the routes along which the trunk sewer, subsewer and branches of trunk water main and laterals are to be constructed.

In case of dikes or other structures to protect the city or town or any part thereof from overflow or to open, deepen, straighten, or enlarge watercourses, waterways and other channels the resolution must set forth the place of commencement and ending thereof and the route to be used.

In the case of auxiliary water systems, or extensions thereof or additions thereto for protection of the city or town or any part thereof from fire, the resolution must set forth the routes along which the auxiliary water system or extensions thereof or additions thereto are to be constructed and specifications of the structures or works necessary thereto or forming a part thereof.

The resolution shall be published in at least two consecutive issues of the official newspaper of the city or town, the first publication to be at least fifteen days before the day fixed for the hearing.

The hearing herein required may be held before the city or town council, or other legislative authority, or before a committee thereof. The legislative authority of a city or town may designate an officer to conduct the hearings. The committee or hearing officer shall report recommendations on the resolution to the legislative authority for final action.

[ 1994 c 71 s 2; 1989 c 243 s 2; 1985 c 469 s 29; 1984 c 203 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.43.140. Prior: 1957 c 144 s 8; prior: 1953 c 177 s 1. (i) 1929 c 97 s 1, part; 1911 c 98 s 10, part; RRS s 9361, part. (ii) 1911 c 98 s 16, part; RRS s 9368, part. (iii) 1911 c 98 s 17, part; RRS s 9369, part. (iv) 1911 c 98 s 18, part; RRS s 9370, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 203: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 203 s 10.]